grammar.foma
read lexc from-class.lexc
define Lexicon;

source features.foma

# Composite features
define +dor %-syl & [ %+hi | %+lo | %+back ] ;
define +pal %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %-back ];
define +velar %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %+back ] ; # confirm this

define +plos [ %-son & %-cont & %-delrel ] ;
define +fric [ %-son & %+cont ] ;
define +approx [ %+son & %-nas ] ;
define -approx [ ~%+approx | r ] ;

# Word final sonorant consonantal deletion, /n r/
define SonCorDeletion [ %-approx & %-syl & %+cor & %+son] -> 0 || _ .#. ;

# Adjacent homorganic cons deletion
# How variables?
define HomCorDeletion [ %-syl & %+cor ] -> 0 || [ %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] _ .#. ;
define HomDorDeletion [ %-syl & %+dor ] -> 0 || [ %-syl & %+dor & %+son ] _ .#. ;
define HomDeletion HomCorDeletion .o. HomDorDeletion ;

# Nasal place assimilation
# Should confirm in big corpus that palatal (anterior) nasal is in fact allophone of N
# Yes but.. something more complicated going on
# e.g. forassenyat
# Also, by specifying -ant we're predicting h and t͡ʃ, maybe that makes sense though

define AnteriorAssim n -> ɲ || _ [ %-ant ] ;
define VelarAssim n -> ŋ || _ [ %+velar ] ;
define NasalPlaceAssim VelarAssim .o. AnteriorAssim;

# Vocalic deletion: vowels followed by schwa are deleted.
# e.g. əgzaktə +Fem
# but also dropuə, flɔnd͡ʒuə are bad vs kruə, nuə are good?
# exceptions or either some long-distance dep or irregular or syllabic or stress related?
# perhaps more evidence in big corpus?
# Preliminarily concluding they're exceptions, since they're the only [-ue] examples in the big
# corpus, besides akrue
define VocDeletion [ %+syl ] -> 0 || _ ə ;

define VocDeletionExceptions [
	[{nu} 	"+Fem" .x. {nuə}] |
	[{kru} 	"+Fem" .x. {kruə}]
] ;

# How to do feature arithmetic?

# Word final plosive devoicing
define WordFinPlosiveDevoicing  ɡ -> k,
 								d -> t,
 								b -> p,
 								z -> s || _ .#. ;

# Word final affrication
# [+fric] -> [-cont, +delrel]
define WordFinAffrication ʒ -> t͡ʃ,
						  ð -> d͡ʒ || _ .#. ;

# Voiced stops become (continuant) fricatives in between sonorant continuants
# [ %+plos & %+voi ] -> [ %+cont ] || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ]
# exception: fəkun
define InterConFrication ɡ -> ɣ,
						 d -> ð,
						 b -> β || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ] ;

# Surely there will be more.
define Exceptions VocDeletionExceptions;

define Grammar Lexicon
	.o. NasalPlaceAssim
	.o. SonCorDeletion
	.o. HomDeletion
	.o. VocDeletion
 	.o. WordFinPlosiveDevoicing
 	.o. WordFinAffrication
 	.o. InterConFrication;

 define Grammar [Exceptions .P. Grammar];

# read lexc from-class.masc.lexc
# define MascLexicon;

# read lexc from-class.fem.lexc
# define FemLexicon;

# define FinalLexicon [MascLexicon | FemLexicon];

# regex [FinalLexicon - Grammar.l];
